test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-wahkwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wâhkw - ok : # -m animate noun, roe
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg: wâhkwa
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâhkom
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâhkom
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: owâhkoma
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâhkominân
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâhkominaw
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâhkomiwâw
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: owâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa

     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl: wâhkwak
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâhkomak
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâhkomak
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: owâhkoma
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâhkominânak
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâhkominawak
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâhkomiwâwak
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: owâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa

     wâhkwa+N+AN+Sg+Obv: wâhkwa
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Loc: wâhkohk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâhkomihk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâhkomihk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: owâhkomihk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: owâhkomiyihk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâhkominâhk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwâhkominâhk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: owâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: owâhkomiyihk

     wâhkwa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: wâhkosis
     wâhkwa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: wâhkosisak
